Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska33-153
Fees for acknowledgments, oaths, affirmations; report to county board; payment to county treasurer.

All fees received for taking acknowledgments, oaths and affirmations, by any county officer, or any deputy or employee in his office, whether received for taking acknowledgments, oaths and affirmations, in an official capacity as a county officer or while acting in the capacity of a notary public, must be reported to the county board and paid into the county treasury. Any person who shall violate any of the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined in a sum not in excess of one hundred dollars. Any county officer or deputy so offending shall also be subject to removal from office.

Laws 1943, c. 85, § 1, p. 285;

R.S.1943, § 33-153.